Hawaii statutes.
§5-22 Hawaii medal of honor. (a)
The Hawaii medal of honor may be awarded on behalf of the people of the State
of Hawaii to an individual who has been killed in action while:

(1) Engaged in an action against an enemy of the
United States;

(2) Engaged in military operations involving conflict
with an opposing foreign force;

(3) Serving with friendly foreign forces engaged in
an armed conflict against an opposing armed force in which the United States is
not a belligerent party;

(4) Serving in a combat zone as designated by
presidential order;

(5) Serving in direct support of military operations
in a combat zone if that service is designated as such by the United States
Department of Defense; or

(6) Performing duty subject to hostile fire or
imminent danger if that duty qualifies the individual for special military pay
as determined by the United States Department of Defense.

(b) A recipient of the Hawaii medal of honor
may have the recipient's name entered on the Hawaii medal of honor roll.

(c) Individuals eligible to receive the
Hawaii medal of honor include:

(1) Members of the Hawaii National Guard who were
legal residents of Hawaii and were activated into service at the time they were
killed in action;

(2) Members of the United States military reserves
who were legal residents of Hawaii and were activated into service at the time
they were killed in action;

(3) Members of the regular United States armed forces
who were:

(A) Legal residents of Hawaii at the time
they were killed in action; or

(B) Stationed in Hawaii by a proper order of
the United States Department of Defense at the time they were killed in action;
and

(4) Members of the Hawaii National Guard or United
States military reserves who were activated into service, or members of the
regular United States armed forces, who:

(A) Attended a public or private educational
institution in Hawaii at some period during their lives; and

(B) Were killed in action.

(d) The Hawaii medal of honor shall be awarded
solely by a concurrent resolution:

(1) Introduced by:

(A) The president of the senate;

(B) The speaker of the house of
representatives; or

(C) The duly authorized representative of the
president of the senate or the speaker of the house of representatives; and

(2) Adopted by both houses of the legislature. [L
2005, c 21, §2; am L 2013, c 9, §2]

Revision Note

Section was enacted as an addition to chapter 121 but is
renumbered to this chapter pursuant to §23G-15.

Cross References

POW/MIA flag; recognition; use, see §5-18.5.

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next